Illinois, session 104th, HB2537.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 514-8.03 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14-8.03)  (from Ch. 122, par. 14-8.03)7    Sec. 14-8.03. Transition services. 8    (a) For purposes of this Section:9    "Independent living skills" may include, without 10limitation, personal hygiene, health care, fitness, food 11preparation and nutrition, home management and safety, 12dressing and clothing care, financial management and wellness, 13self-esteem, self-advocacy, self-determination, community 14living, housing options, public safety, leisure and 15recreation, and transportation.16    "Transition services" means a coordinated set of 17activities for a child with a disability that (i) is designed 18to be within a results-oriented process that is focused on 19improving the academic and functional achievement of the child 20with a disability to facilitate the child's movement from 21school to post-school activities, including post-secondary 22education, which may include for-credit courses, career and 23technical education, and non-credit courses and instruction,   HB2537 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08091 LNS 18137 b1vocational education, integrated employment (including 2supported employment), continuing and adult education, adult 3services, independent living, or community participation; (ii) 4is based on the individual child's needs, taking into account 5the child's strengths, preferences, and interests; and (iii) 6includes instruction, related services, community experiences, 7the development of employment and other post-school adult 8living objectives, and, if appropriate, acquisition of daily 9living skills, benefits counseling and planning, work 10incentives education, and the provision of a functional 11vocational evaluation. Transition services for a child with a 12disability may be special education, if provided as specially 13designed instruction, or a related service if required to 14assist a child with a disability to benefit from special 15education. 16    (a-5) Beginning no later than the first individualized 17education program plan (IEP) in effect when the student turns 18age 14 1/2 (or younger if determined appropriate by the IEP 19Team) and updated annually thereafter, the IEP must include 20(i) measurable post-secondary goals based upon age-appropriate 21transition assessments and other information available 22regarding the student that are related to training, education, 23employment, and independent living skills and (ii) the 24transition services needed to assist the student in reaching 25those goals, including courses of study.26    As a component of transition planning, the school district   HB2537 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08091 LNS 18137 b1shall provide the student and the parent or guardian of the 2student with information about the school district's career 3and technical education (CTE) opportunities and postsecondary 4CTE opportunities. The CTE information shall include a list of 5programming options, the scope and sequence of study for 6pursuing those options, and the locations of those options. A 7student in high school with an IEP may enroll in the school 8district's CTE program at any time if participation in a CTE 9program is consistent with the student's transition goals. 10    The student and the parent or guardian of the student 11shall be provided with information about dual credit courses 12offered by the school district. The information shall include 13courses offered by the school district for dual credit under 14Section 16 of the Dual Credit Quality Act and courses in which 15the student may enroll for high school credit only under 16Section 16.5 of the Dual Credit Quality Act. The information 17shall include the criteria for entry into any dual credit 18course in which the student or the parent or guardian of the 19student indicates interest. If the student is enrolled in a 20dual credit course for dual credit or for high school credit 21only, the student's participation in the course shall be 22included as part of the student's transition IEP activities. 23    The student's transition plan shall include consideration 24of the student's assistive technology needs, such as assistive 25technology evaluations, devices, and services, related to the 26student's transition goals for employment, education or   HB2537 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08091 LNS 18137 b1training, and independent living, both while the student is 2participating in transition-related activities and in 3post-school activities. The student's transition plan shall 4also include consideration of the availability and 5accessibility of appropriate assistive technology devices and 6services for the student once in the post-school environment. 7    By the school year in which the student turns 16, the 8transition planning process must include discussions with the 9student's IEP team, including the student, the student's 10parent or guardian, and other appropriate team members, 11regarding the student's graduation status and the implications 12of high school graduation.13    The transition planning process must include informing the 14student, the student's parent or guardian, and the student's 15designated representative under Section 14-6.10 that (i) 16graduation with a regular high school diploma terminates the 17student's eligibility for a free appropriate public education 18(FAPE) under the federal Individuals with Disabilities 19Education Act and State law and (ii) under Section 14-1.02, 20the student can continue to receive IEP services until the end 21of the school year in which the student turns 22 when 22appropriate to meet the student's IEP goals. 23    (b) Transition planning must be conducted as part of the 24IEP process and must be governed by the procedures applicable 25to the development, review, and revision of the IEP, including 26notices to the parents and student, parent and student   HB2537 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08091 LNS 18137 b1participation, and annual review. To appropriately assess and 2develop IEP transition goals and transition services for a 3child with a disability, additional participants may be 4necessary and may be invited by the school district, parent, 5or student to participate in the transition planning process. 6Additional participants may include without limitation a 7representative from the Department of Human Services or 8another State agency, a case coordinator, or persons 9representing other public or community agencies or services, 10such as adult service providers, disability services 11coordinators of public community colleges, and a CTE 12coordinator. The IEP shall identify each person responsible 13for coordinating and delivering transition services. If the 14IEP team determines that the student requires transition 15services from a public or private entity outside of the school 16district, the IEP team shall identify potential outside 17resources, assign one or more IEP team members to contact the 18appropriate outside entities, make the necessary referrals, 19provide any information and documents necessary to complete 20the referral, follow up with the entity to ensure that the 21student has been successfully linked to the entity, and 22monitor the student's progress to determine if the student's 23IEP transition goals and benchmarks are being met. The 24student's IEP shall indicate one or more specific time periods 25during the school year when the IEP team shall review the 26services provided by the outside entity and the student's   HB2537 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08091 LNS 18137 b1progress in such activities. The public school's 2responsibility for delivering educational services does not 3extend beyond the time the student leaves school or when the 4student's eligibility ends due to age under this Article.5    (c) A school district shall submit annually a summary of 6each eligible student's IEP transition goals and transition 7services resulting from the IEP Team meeting to the 8appropriate local Transition Planning Committee. If students 9with disabilities who are ineligible for special education 10services request transition services, local public school 11districts shall assist those students by identifying 12post-secondary school goals, delivering appropriate education 13services, and coordinating with other agencies and services 14for assistance.15(Source: P.A. 102-516, eff. 8-20-21; 103-181, eff. 6-30-23; 16103-854, eff. 8-9-24.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.